Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3650.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28 of chapter 32A, as so appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care
services, as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-
month period for any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed
all at once or over the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person
was enrolled in the policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however,
that a corporation shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-
month prescription in a single dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION 2. Section 10K of Chapter 118E, as so appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
of 3

“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care
services, as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-
month period for any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed
all at once or over the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person
was enrolled in the policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however,
that a corporation shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-
month prescription in a single dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION 3. Section 47W of Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care
services, as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-
month period for any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed
all at once or over the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person
was enrolled in the policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however,
that a corporation shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-
month prescription in a single dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION 4. Section 8W of Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care
services, as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-
month period for any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed
all at once or over the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person
of 3

was enrolled in the policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however,
that a corporation shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-
month prescription in a single dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION 5. Section 4W of Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care
services, as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-
month period for any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed
all at once or over the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person
was enrolled in the policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however,
that a corporation shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-
month prescription in a single dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION 6. Section 4O of Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care
services, as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-
month period for any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed
all at once or over the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person
was enrolled in the policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however,
that a corporation shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-
month prescription in a single dispensing per plan year.”
of 3